sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX W   ť           jú         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   ť           júc        [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:participle
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   ť           la         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   ť           lo         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   ť           li         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   iť          i          [bčdkľnprszž]iť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   yť          y          [bčdkľnprszž]yť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   ť           me         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ť           te         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ť           jem        [bčdkľprszž]uť is:1st_person
SFX W   ť           ješ        [bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person
SFX W   ť           je         [bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person
SFX W   ť           jeme       [bčdkľprszž]uť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   ť           jete       [bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   ť           jú         [bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   ť           júc        [bčdkľprszž]uť is:participle
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľprszž]uť is:1st_person
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   ť           la         [bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   ť           lo         [bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   ť           li         [bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   ť           j          [bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   ť           jme        [bčdkľprszž]uť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ť           jte        [bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   uť          em         [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:1st_person
SFX W   uť          eš         [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person
SFX W   uť          e          [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person
SFX W   uť          eme        [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   uť          ete        [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   uť          u          [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   uť          uc         [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:participle
SFX W   uť          i          [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   uť          ime        [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   uť          ite        [^bčdkľprszž]uť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   nuť         ol         nuť is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   nuť         ol         nuť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   nuť         ol         nuť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   nuť         la         nuť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   nuť         lo         nuť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   nuť         li         nuť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   úť          ujem       [bčdkľrszž]úť is:1st_person
SFX W   úť          uješ       [bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person
SFX W   úť          uje        [bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person
SFX W   úť          ujeme      [bčdkľrszž]úť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   úť          ujete      [bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   úť          ujú        [bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   úť          ujúc       [bčdkľrszž]úť is:participle
SFX W   úť          uj         [bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   úť          ujme       [bčdkľrszž]úť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   úť          ujte       [bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   úť          ul         [bčdkľrszž]úť is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   úť          ul         [bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   úť          ul         [bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   úť          ula        [bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   úť          ulo        [bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   úť          uli        [bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   úť          em         [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:1st_person
SFX W   úť          eš         [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person
SFX W   úť          e          [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person
SFX W   úť          eme        [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   úť          ete        [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   úť          ú          [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   úť          úc         [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:participle
SFX W   úť          i          [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   úť          ime        [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   úť          ite        [^bčdkľrszž]úť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   núť         ol         [^aeilľory]núť is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   núť         ol         [^aeilľory]núť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   núť         ol         [^aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   núť         la         [^aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   núť         lo         [^aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   núť         li         [^aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   úť          ul         [aeilľory]núť is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   úť          ul         [aeilľory]núť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   úť          ul         [aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   úť          ula        [aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   úť          ulo        [aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   úť          uli        [aeilľory]núť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   iť          ijem       [šv]iť is:1st_person
SFX W   iť          iješ       [šv]iť is:2nd_person
SFX W   iť          ije        [šv]iť is:3rd_person
SFX W   iť          ijeme      [šv]iť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   iť          ijete      [šv]iť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   iť          ijú        [šv]iť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   iť          ijúc       [šv]iť is:participle
SFX W   iť          i          [šv]iť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   iť          ime        [šv]iť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   iť          ite        [šv]iť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   iť          il         [šv]iť is:1st_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   iť          ila        [šv]iť is:2nd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   iť          ilo        [šv]iť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   iť          il         [šv]iť is:1st_person is:past
